Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 29 DRAINAGE DISTRICTS
§ 42-2965. Payment of assessments.

The assessments levied by the commissioners of the drainage districts must be paid in lawful money of the United States; provided that warrants of the district may be accepted as cash for the payment of assessments levied for warrant redemption, and that matured bonds of the district and accrued interest coupons detached from any of the bonds of the district, when presented may be accepted as cash in payment of assessment levied for bond interest and principal, and in the event that the said bonds so used are of a greater denomination than the said assessments, the tax collector shall indorse upon said bond or bonds the amount necessary to pay said assessment or assessments and the date of said payment and take a receipt from such bondholder for the amount so credited, and either such receipt describing the bond so indorsed or such indorsement shall be prima facie evidence that the said sum so indorsed has been paid on said bond or bonds.

§ 42-2966. Interested persons — Right of examination.

Any person or corporation having an interest in, or lien upon, any land situate within the boundaries of a drainage district now organized or existing, or hereafter organized under the laws of the state of Idaho, and which land has been, or hereafter may be, assessed for benefits for the construction of drainage works in said district, as provided in this chapter, as shown by the assessment roll of said district, confirmed by the court, shall have the right personally, or through his agents, attorneys or auditors to examine the books, records and accounts of the drainage commissioners and to make copies thereof.

§ 42-2967. Interested persons — Right to demand statement showing amount of lien and total payments — Form.

Any person or corporation having an interest in, or lien upon, any land situate within the boundaries of a drainage district now organized and existing or hereafter organized under the laws of the state of Idaho, and which land has been, or hereafter may be, assessed for benefits for the construction of drainage works in said district, as provided in this chapter, as shown by the assessment roll of said district, confirmed by the court, and upon which any calls for assessments have been made against said assessment roll by the drainage commissioners of said district, and any or all of which calls shall have been paid upon said land, shall have the right to demand in writing from the commissioners of said drainage district and from the county treasurer of the county in which such land is situate, a statement giving the following information:

Amount of original lien against said land as shown by the assessment roll of said district and confirmed by the court;

Total payments made upon said land by reason of calls against said assessment roll;

Total credit given on the original lien against said land created by the assessment, by reason of the payment made on calls by the drainage commissioners.

Said demand shall be personally served upon the secretary of the board of drainage commissioners of said district, and upon the county treasurer of said county.

Within ten days after the service of said notice, the commissioners of said drainage district and said county treasurer shall furnish to the person making said demand a statement in writing giving the information required by said demand. Said statement so furnished by the drainage commissioners and the county treasurer may be in one instrument or in separate instruments. The same shall be signed by the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners of said district and attested by the secretary thereof, and shall also be signed by the county treasurer.

§ 42-2968. Right of action by interested persons for accounting.

If such person or corporation making said demand shall be dissatisfied as to the total amount paid or the credit given on the original lien as shown by said statements furnished under the provisions of section 42-2967[, Idaho Code], he or it shall have the right to bring an action in the district court of the county in which such land is situate, against said district and the county treasurer of the county, for the purpose of securing a determination by the court as to the total amount of payments made and the amount which should have been credited upon the lien against said lands created by the assessment roll of said district as confirmed by the court.

§ 42-2969. Access to records by interested persons for preparation of action for trial.

Upon the filing of said complaint said plaintiff, his agents, attorneys and auditors, shall have free access to the books, records and accounts of the drainage commissioners and shall have the right to examine the same and make copies thereof, and the secretary of said drainage district shall furnish such certified copies of said records as the plaintiff may designate, said plaintiff furnishing the copies ready for certification at his own expense. He shall also have access to the records of the county treasurer insofar as they pertain to his property, including the assessment roll of the drainage district, the distribution of moneys paid by him, and such other matters as may pertain to the preparation of his case for trial.

§ 42-2970. Method of procedure in actions by interested persons.

The procedure provided by law for the trial and determination of other civil actions, and appeal to the Supreme Court of the state of Idaho, shall govern the procedure in any action brought under the provisions of this act; provided, however, that no costs shall be awarded to either party, either in the district court or upon appeal to the Supreme Court.

§ 42-2971. Payment of annual or delinquent assessments or unpaid liens with bonds, matured interest coupons, warrants or cash.

Any person or corporation having an interest in or title to, or recorded mortgage or other lien upon any tract, lot or parcel of land, or any part thereof, situate within the boundaries of any drainage district now organized and existing, or that may hereafter be organized, under the laws of the state of Idaho, may at any time pay all or any part of the annual or delinquent drainage assessments due at the time of such payment, except as hereinafter otherwise provided, or may pay the whole or any part of the unpaid portion of the lien against said property as shown by the assessment roll of said district as confirmed by the court and filed with the county auditor, whether due or to become due, together with the accrued interest, if any, on any such annual or delinquent assessments, either in lawful money of the United States or with the bonds of the district at the face or par value thereof, of any date, number, series or denomination, whether original issue, funding or refunding and whether such bonds are due at the time of payment or will become due at a future date, and/or with warrants or matured interest coupons of said district at the face or par value of the same; and it shall be the duty of the county treasurer of the county in which said land is situate to accept said bonds, matured interest coupons and warrants in payment, or part payment, of any such annual or delinquent drainage assessments, or in payment of the unpaid portion of the lien against said real property created by the assessment roll of such drainage district; provided, however, that such bonds, interest coupons, and warrants hereinabove referred to shall have been issued by said drainage district subsequent to the date this act becomes effective.

§ 42-2972. Release of lands from further liability upon full payment.

Upon payment in full being made to the county treasurer of the lien against any such tract, lot or parcel of land, either in lawful money of the United States and/or drainage district bonds, matured interest coupons or warrants, as provided in section 42-2971[, Idaho Code], the county treasurer shall issue and deliver to such person or corporation making said payment a receipt for the amount of such payment, stating therein the total amount paid, the amount paid in cash, in bonds, in warrants and matured interest coupons of said district; and shall thereupon issue and deliver to such person or corporation a release and discharge releasing such tract, lot or parcel of land from all other or further liability for the payment of any of the then existing bonded indebtedness of the district, or any bonds thereafter issued to refund the same, or of any warrants theretofore, or that may thereafter be, issued for the payment of interest on any such bonds or refunding bonds, and releasing and discharging such tract, lot or parcel of land from the payment of any other or further liens created by reason of the assessment for benefits against said tract, lot or parcel of land as shown in the assessment roll of said district confirmed by the court; and such tract, lot or parcel of land shall not thereafter be assessed by such drainage district by reason of benefits theretofore assessed and confirmed by the court, except for the purpose of operation and maintenance thereof; provided, that all assessments for operation and maintenance theretofore levied or thereafter to be levied shall be payable only in lawful money of the United States or in warrants of the district issued against the operation and maintenance fund within the calendar year in which such warrants are tendered in payment, in which event such warrants shall be accepted by the county treasurer at par or face value thereof in payment of operation and maintenance charges.

§ 42-2973. Form of release and discharge.

The release and discharge provided for in section 42-2972, Idaho Code, shall be in substantially the following form:

Release and discharge from liability from payment of the bonded and warrant indebtedness of drainage district number ...... in .............. County, Idaho, from the lien of the assessment roll of said district as confirmed by the court.

WHEREAS, on the .... day of ............, ....,

.......... (The owner, part owner, mortgagee or other lienholder, as the case may be) paid to the County Treasurer of .............. County, Idaho, .... (in cash, bonds, warrants or matured interest coupons of said district, as the case may be) the sum of $ ...., being the total unpaid amount of the lien against the real property hereinafter described, created by the assessment roll of said district; said property being situate within Drainage District Number ...., in .... County, Idaho, and particularly described as follows, to wit:

§ 42-2974. Filing and recording of release and discharge — Effect.

Such release and discharge, when filed for record and recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which such tract, lot or parcel of land is situate, shall operate as a release and discharge of the land therein described from the payment of all existing indebtedness of said district, and release the same from the lien thereof, created by the assessment roll of said district, confirmed by the court; save and except levies made or to be made for the operation and maintenance of said district.

§ 42-2975. Cancellation of bonds and warrants upon delivery.

All bonds, together with all unmatured coupons attached, matured interest coupons and warrants delivered to the county treasurer under the provisions of this act shall be cancelled in the same manner as if called for payment and paid.

§ 42-2976. Payment of bonds after default.

All bonds hereafter issued by any drainage distrct [district] in the state of Idaho, whether original issue, funding or refunding, shall be governed by the provisions of this act in regard to the payment thereof after default as hereafter provided.

§ 42-2977. Pro rata payment of interest and bonds.

If at any time twenty per cent (20%) or more of the entire issued, uncalled and outstanding bonds of such district shall be past due and unpaid, after the application of all funds available for the payment thereof, then the numerical order, or other provisions of law, of payment of all outstanding and uncalled bonds of such district shall immediately cease, and thereafter the county treasurer shall distribute all funds coming into his hands applicable to the payment of bonds pro rata on all outstanding and uncalled bonds, whether due or to become due, to the end that after such default in the percentage herein set out, there shall be paid on each outstanding and uncalled bond its equal and ratable proportion of all funds so collected for the payment of said bonds; provided further, that if at the time of such default there shall be matured and unpaid interest on any or all of such outstanding bonds, then all moneys thereafter available for the payment of interest shall be applied toward the payment of interest longest in default until all bonds shall have assumed the same relative position in regard to interest payment. When interest shall have been paid on all outstanding bonds to the same date, thereafter all moneys available for the payment of interest shall be paid equally and ratably to the holders of all outstanding and uncalled bonds. No payment shall be made by the county treasurer after such default, upon either principal or interest, except upon presentation of the bond and the indorsement by the county treasurer of the amount paid thereon, together with the date of payment, except in the event of full payment of interest coupons, said coupons shall be surrendered to the county treasurer.

§ 42-2978. Redemption of lands from lien for unpaid assessments.

The owner of any land within any drainage district charged with the lien of any assessment under the provisions of this chapter, may redeem the same from all liability by paying the unpaid portion of the assessment lien against such land, as shown by the assessment roll of said district, plus interest to the time of such payment; provided that the bonds of the drainage district and the accrued interest coupons thereon shall be accepted by the tax collector as cash in payment of such lien and assessment; and upon payment by any landowner of such lien and assessment against any land the same shall be relieved of all further liability and shall not be subject to any further or subsequent assessment by said district except only for the maintenance and operation of the drainage works of the district; and, provided further, upon full payment being made, as hereinabove provided, in cash and/or bonds and interest coupons, the tax collector shall issue to such owner a receipt showing the lien of the assessment against such land is fully paid and satisfied; and such tax collector shall also note upon the assessment roll of said district the full payment of the assessment against such land. All bonds and interest coupons delivered to the tax collector under the provisions of this act shall be canceled in the same manner as bonds which have been called for payment and paid.

§ 42-2979. Sale of personal property — Procedure.

Personal property of a drainage district may be sold by its board of commissioners whenever the board finds and by resolution declares that the district no longer has use therefor.

If, in the opinion of the board, such property does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in value, it may sell the same without independent appraisal, notice or competitive bids.

Personal property exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in estimated value shall first be appraised by three (3) disinterested freeholders of the district, who shall be selected by the board. It may then be sold at public or private sale to the highest bidder for cash at not less than its appraised value, after due notice.

Notice of sale shall describe the property, the appraised value thereof (by separate items, if so appraised), and the time, place and condition of sale.

If the appraised value does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), notice of sale shall be posted in three (3) public places in said district to be determined in the resolution of said board of commissioners (one (1) of which shall be at the office or meeting place of said board) at least ten (10) days before the date of sale.

If the appraised value of the property exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), notice shall be posted as set forth in subsection 4. of this section and in addition shall be published in a weekly newspaper, published or having a general circulation in the district, once each week during the four (4) weeks preceding the date of sale.

§ 42-2979A. Trade-in or exchange of district property.

Whenever the board of commissioners of a drainage district finds and by resolution declares that the district no longer has use for any personal property of the district, or finds and declares that such property is no longer economical to use, the district may, in lieu of the sale of said property as provided in section 42-2979, Idaho Code, dispose of the property by exchanging the same in part payment for new or replacement property.

If the acquisition of the new or replacement property is to be let to bid under the provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code, the district shall include in its request for bids a full description of the property to be exchanged as part payment and shall permit any interested bidder to examine the same, and any contract let as a result of said bid shall be awarded on the basis of net cost to the district after allowance for the property to be exchanged in part payment.

Exchange of property will be permitted only when, in the opinion of the board of commissioners of the district, the sale of property under the provisions of section 42-2979, Idaho Code, will yield a lesser monetary return to the district than the exchange thereof as provided in this section.

§ 42-2980. Dissolution of drainage district.

A drainage district may be dissolved by the district court for the county in which the office of such drainage district was last located on complaint or petition of parties holding and owning:

Fifty per cent (50%) or more of the issued, outstanding, unpaid bonds of such district; or,

Fifty per cent (50%) or more of all land situated within the boundaries of such district; or,

Claims, warrants, liens or other legal obligations of such district in an amount equal to not less than thirty per cent (30%) of the issued, outstanding and unpaid bonds of such district.

That the district has been abandoned, or for two (2) or more years last past has ceased to function, and there is little or no possibility that it ever will function in the future.

That no useful purpose exists for the further continuance of the organization of the district.

That there are not sufficient qualified voters of such district to hold a legal election.

That all essential functions of the district are or may be carried out and performed by another political subdivision of the state or other public or quasi public body to which all or any portion of the facilities of said district may be transferred by order of the court; provided, however, that the court, at its discretion, may require that interested persons be given further notice and opportunity to be heard with reference to any such proposed transfer.

It must be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court, by such complaint or petition, that any one or more of the following conditions exist in or as to said district:

§ 42-2981. Certain public and private lands liable for costs and expense of drainage — Collection of drainage charges.

Lands, whether public or private, which have been developed for commercial, industrial, recreational, residential, governmental or highway purposes, and from which surface water or seepage drain into the irrigation or drainage system of any person or persons, canal company, irrigation district, drainage district, or ditch owners’ association, shall be liable for a proportionate share of the cost and expense of operating, maintaining, repairing and replacing the portions of such system which are used or allocated for drainage purposes. Drainage charges for any such lands which are not subject to the regular assessment powers of the person or entity owning or controlling the system shall be billed to, and shall be paid promptly by, the governmental unit owning the land. If the lands are privately owned, the drainage charges shall be billed to, and shall be paid promptly by the county in which the lands are located, and such charges shall be included in the county budget as a separate fund for drainage, the tax for which shall be levied against all privately owned lands in the county which are benefited by such drainage and which are not subject to the regular assessment powers of the owner of the irrigation or drainage system.

§ 42-2982. Consolidation of districts.

If the boards of commissioners of any two (2) or more drainage districts formed under this chapter deem it in the best interest of their respective districts that they be consolidated into a single district, and if said districts are contiguous or lie at least in part within the same county, such boards may petition the district court of the county in which a greater portion of the lands of said proposed district are located for an order consolidating the same districts. For purposes of this section, districts may be considered to be contiguous even though they are separated by a body of water or other natural barrier so long as they are located in close proximity to each other. The petition shall be a joint petition signed by a majority of the commissioners of each respective board and attested to by the secretary of each board. The petition shall set forth a description of the lands and boundaries for the respective districts, a description of the proposed consolidated district and any facts showing that the consolidation is in the best interests of said districts. The petition shall also set forth and report the total outstanding obligation bonds of each consolidating district, the total value of the assets held by each consolidating district, the total levy assessed in each consolidating district in its most recent fiscal year, and the projected total levy to be assessed for the next complete fiscal year in the proposed newly consolidated district.

Evidence showing that the proposed consolidation is in the best interests of the districts may include, but is not limited to: that which shows that the proposed system of drainage will be conducive to providing the same benefits previously apportioned to the lands within the respective districts, enhance the functioning of the respective districts, the public health, convenience and welfare, or increase the public revenue, or that the consolidation of said districts and the said system of drainage and reclamation is a proper and an advantageous method of accomplishing the relief sought.

Upon receiving a petition brought under this section, the district court shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition, and the time and manner of filing any objections to the petition. Said hearing shall be held no sooner than sixty (60) days and no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the first publication of notice of hearing. The clerk of the court shall cause publication of such order in three (3) consecutive weekly issues in a newspaper of general circulation within each county in which any of the lands within the said proposed consolidated district are located; together with a notice of the time and place at which the district court will consider said petition for consolidation. The petitioners shall pay all costs of publication.

Any person objecting to a petition for consolidation as described in this section shall provide for filing of written objection with the court. Only landowners within the proposed consolidated district, owners of land over which the drainage water from the proposed district would flow, and landowners served by any of the respective districts included in the petition shall have standing to file an objection to said petition. Written objections must be filed and served upon petitioners no later than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date of the hearing. The form of the objection shall be as provided in the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Each objection shall identify the name of the landowner entering the objection along with the objecting party’s address, location of the landowner’s land by township, range and section; identify the district or districts in which those lands lie; and state the nature or description of objection and basis or reasoning for the objection. Objections shall be limited to determining whether or not the proposed consolidation is in the best interests of the districts.
(5) The judge of the court shall, at the hearing herein provided, hear and consider argument from the petitioners and decide whether the proposed consolidation is in the best interests of said districts. The court shall then consider evidence in objection only from landowners who have filed a written objection as described in subsection (4) of this section, and only such evidence as may be presented for or against the petition or objections thereto. The landowners who have filed written objections shall bear the burden of proving that the consolidation is not in the best interests of the districts. After any evidence offered in opposition to the petition, the petitioners may offer evidence regarding the consolidation or in opposition to any objections entered. Based on the agreement in the petition to consolidate by the boards of the respective districts, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the proposed consolidation of the districts is in the best interests of the petitioning districts and the landowners therein, unless the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the proposed consolidation is not in the best interests of the districts. Consolidation shall not be permitted to either exclude from the consolidated district lands that are within the petitioning districts or to include lands within the consolidated district that are not within the petitioning districts. The court shall make its determination wholly in the affirmative or negative whether said petitioning districts shall be consolidated.

(6) If the petition is granted, the court shall cause an order to be entered and recorded in the judgment record of each of the counties in which the lands within the consolidated district are situated, setting forth the facts found upon the hearing of said petition, and said order shall define the boundaries of said district and describe the lands included therein by township, range and section only. The clerk of said district court shall cause a copy of the order declaring said consolidated district, duly certified, to be filed in the office of the secretary of state. From the date of said filing and thereafter, said district consolidation shall be deemed complete.

(7) The court shall name the commissioners appointed by it for the consolidated district pursuant to the provisions of section 42-2910, Idaho Code. In appointing commissioners to the newly consolidated district, the court shall consider preference to appointment of at least one (1) commissioner from each of the districts petitioning for consolidation. The consolidated district shall be known and described by the name and number of the largest district of those consolidated.

(8) The provisions of this section shall apply exclusively to the consolidation of drainage districts which have been formed under this chapter.